Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.113

Automatic fire-extinguishing systems for certain school buildings.

The building code council shall adopt rules by December 1, 1991, requiring that all buildings classed as E-1 occupancies, as defined in the state building code, except portable school classrooms, constructed after July 28, 1991, be provided with an automatic fire-extinguishing system. Rules adopted by the council shall consider applicable nationally recognized fire and building code standards and local conditions.

By December 15, 1991, the council shall transmit to the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and the fire protection policy board copies of the rules as adopted. The superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and the fire protection policy board shall respond to the council by February 15, 1992, with any recommended changes to the rule. If changes are recommended the council shall immediately consider those changes to the rules through its rule-making procedures. The rules shall be effective on July 1, 1992.

[ 1991 c 170 s 1.]

NOTES:

Schools—Standards for fire prevention and safety: RCW 43.44.030.